Hawaii statutes.
[§103-55.5] Wages and hours of employees on
public works construction contracts. (a) Before any bidder or offeror
enters into a contract for construction of a public work project in excess of
$2,000, which is subject to chapter 104, the bidder or offeror shall affirm the
bidder's or offeror's intent to comply with the requirements of chapter 104 by
certifying that:

(1) Individuals engaged in the performance of the
contract on the job site shall be paid:

(A) Not less than the wages that the director
of labor and industrial relations shall have determined to be prevailing for
corresponding classes of laborers and mechanics employed on public works
projects; and

(B) Overtime compensation at one and one-half
times the basic hourly rate plus fringe benefits for hours worked on Saturday,
Sunday, or a legal holiday of the State or in excess of eight hours on any
other day; and

(2) All applicable laws of the federal and state
governments relating to workers' compensation, unemployment compensation,
payment of wages, and safety shall be fully complied with.

(b) No contract for construction of any public
work project in excess of $2,000 shall be granted unless all the conditions of
this section are met.

(c) It shall be the duty of the governmental
contracting agency awarding the contract for construction of a public work
project in excess of $2,000 to enforce this section. [L 2002, c 215, §2]

Cross References

Employment of state residents on construction procurement
contracts, see chapter 103B.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next